Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 3. Payment for State Purchases.

Sec. 37.05.220.
Purchasing agent. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986. For current provisions see AS 36.30.]

Sec. 37.05.225.
[Renumbered as AS 36.30.180.]

Secs. 37.05.230 — 37.05.280.
Competitive bids; contracts; leases. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986. For current provisions, see AS 36.30.]

Sec. 37.05.285.
Payment for state purchases.

Payment for purchases of goods or services provided a state agency shall be made by a required payment date that is

the date on which payment is due under the terms of a contract; or

30 days after receipt of a proper billing for the amount of the payment due, if a date on which payment is due is not established by contract and if the billing contains or is accompanied by documents required by the contract or purchase order.

If a seller offers a discount from the amount otherwise due for property or services in exchange for payment within a specified period of time, the state agency may make payment in an amount equal to the discounted price only if payment is made within the specified period of time.

If payment for goods or services purchased by the state is not made on or before a required payment date under (a) of this section, the state shall pay interest on the unpaid balance from the required payment date at the rate of 1.5 percent a month, unless an agreement exists between the seller and the state that establishes a lower rate of interest or precludes the charging of interest. If the interest-bearing period of time is either (1) a fraction of a month or (2) one or more full months plus a fraction of a month, the state agency shall pay the same amount of interest for the fraction of a month as it would pay for a full month.

This section does not apply

if the cost of the goods or services purchased exceeds $500,000;

to payment for specific goods or services in dispute after a seller of goods or services receives notice from the state official responsible for authorizing payment for goods and services that the amount of the invoice or quality of specific goods or services is in dispute and stating the reasons for the dispute; the state agency shall pay for the specific goods or services in dispute within 30 days after resolution of the dispute; or

to a contract covered by AS

36.90.200

—

36.90.290

.

Interest paid under (c) of this section shall be charged to the budget of the state agency that purchased the goods or services.

In this section,

“dispute” means a determination by the state official responsible for authorizing the payments for the purchase of goods or services that the performance or price charged is not in compliance with the terms of the contract or purchase order;

payment is considered made on the date when the payment is personally delivered to the seller or agent of the seller or on the date the payment is mailed;

“state agency” has the meaning given in AS

37.05.990

and also includes the legislative and judicial branches.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 37.05.275. Renumbered in 1986.

Administrative Code. —

For purchasing, see 2 AAC 15.